Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1308
Watering stock at private tank; unlawful; penalty; exceptions.

(1) It is hereby declared unlawful for any person to water livestock at any watering trough or tanks belonging to any private owner without the consent of such owner, but this section shall not apply to livestock in transportation on railroads nor to livestock delivered into any stockyards nor to livestock in holding pens awaiting slaughter.

(2) Violation of this section is a Class V misdemeanor.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 292.